qa/unittests/data/small/sk_SK.aff
SFX c Y 153 # vzor pre živ. pod.mená. ak N plurál je -ia
SFX c   0           ovia       [éi]	# kuli, abbé
SFX c   0           ho         [éi]
SFX c   0           ov         [éi]
SFX c   0           mu         [éi]
SFX c   0           om         [éi]
SFX c   0           m          [éi]
SFX c   0           och        [éi]
SFX c   0           ami        [éi]
SFX c   us          a          [^ú]..us	# génius
SFX c   us          ovi        [^ú]..us
SFX c   us          om         [^ú]..us
SFX c   us          ovia       [^ú]..us
SFX c   us          ov         [^ú]..us
SFX c   us          och        [^ú]..us
SFX c   us          ami        [^ú]..us
SFX c   0           a          úlius	# Július
SFX c   0           ovi        úlius
SFX c   0           om         úlius
SFX c   0           ovia       úlius
SFX c   0           ov         úlius
SFX c   0           och        úlius
SFX c   0           ami        úlius
SFX c   as          a          [^el]as	# Pytagoras
SFX c   as          ovi        [^el]as
SFX c   as          om         [^el]as
SFX c   as          ovia       [^el]as
SFX c   as          ov         [^el]as
SFX c   as          och        [^el]as
SFX c   as          ami        [^el]as
SFX c   0           a          [el]as	#Atlas, Eneas
SFX c   0           ovi        [el]as
SFX c   0           om         [el]as
SFX c   0           ovia       [el]as
SFX c   0           ov         [el]as
SFX c   0           och        [el]as
SFX c   0           ami        [el]as
SFX c   es          a          [^hxz]es	# herkules - inak ten má dvojtvar
SFX c   es          ovi        [^hxz]es
SFX c   es          om         [^hxz]es
SFX c   es          ovia       [^hxz]es
SFX c   es          ov         [^hxz]es
SFX c   es          och        [^hxz]es
SFX c   0           a          [hxz]es	# Ramzes
SFX c   0           ovi        [hxz]es
SFX c   0           om         [hxz]es
SFX c   0           ovia       [hxz]es
SFX c   0           ov         [hxz]es
SFX c   0           och        [hxz]es
SFX c   0           mi         [hxz]es
SFX c   0           a          [^h]os	#bos, Eros
SFX c   0           ovi        [^h]os
SFX c   0           om         [^h]os
SFX c   0           ovia       [^h]os
SFX c   0           ov         [^h]os
SFX c   0           och        [^h]os
SFX c   0           mi         [^h]os
SFX c   os          a          hos	#Pyrrhos
SFX c   os          ovi        hos
SFX c   os          om         hos
SFX c   os          ovia       hos
SFX c   os          ov         hos
SFX c   os          och        hos
SFX c   os          mi         hos
SFX c   0           a          is	#Denis
SFX c   0           ovi        is
SFX c   0           om         is
SFX c   0           ovia       is
SFX c   0           ov         is
SFX c   0           och        is
SFX c   0           mi         is
SFX c   ec          ca         ec	# skontrolovať odtiaľto
SFX c   ec          cov        ec
SFX c   ec          covi       ec
SFX c   ec          com        ec
SFX c   ec          covia      ec
SFX c   ec          coch       ec
SFX c   ec          cami       ec
SFX c   ec          če         ec	# s5 (otče)
SFX c   ec          cu         ec	# s5 (otcu)
SFX c   0           a          [^e]c
SFX c   on          ni         zon
SFX c   on          na         zon
SFX c   on          nov        zon
SFX c   on          novi       zon
SFX c   on          novia      zon
SFX c   on          nom        zon
SFX c   on          noch       zon
SFX c   on          nami       zon
SFX c   o           a          o
SFX c   0           v          o
SFX c   0           vi         o
SFX c   0           via        o
SFX c   0           ch         o
SFX c   0           m          o
SFX c   o           ami        o
SFX c   0           a          [inp]er
SFX c   0           ov         [inp]er
SFX c   0           ovi        [inp]er
SFX c   0           ovia       [inp]er
SFX c   0           om         [inp]er
SFX c   0           och        [inp]er
SFX c   0           mi         [inp]er
SFX c   er          ra         [^inp]er
SFX c   er          rov        [^inp]er
SFX c   er          rovi       [^inp]er
SFX c   er          rovia      [^inp]er
SFX c   er          rom        [^inp]er
SFX c   er          roch       [^inp]er
SFX c   er          rami       [^inp]er
SFX c   or          ra         [bg]or
SFX c   or          rov        [bg]or
SFX c   or          rovi       [bg]or
SFX c   or          rovia      [bg]or
SFX c   or          rom        [bg]or
SFX c   or          roch       [bg]or
SFX c   or          rami       [bg]or
SFX c   0           a          [^bg]or
SFX c   0           ov         [^bg]or
SFX c   0           ovi        [^bg]or
SFX c   0           ovia       [^bg]or
SFX c   0           om         [^bg]or
SFX c   0           och        [^bg]or
SFX c   0           ami        [^bg]or
SFX c   0           a          [^eo][cr]
SFX c   0           ov         [^eo][cr]
SFX c   0           ovi        [^eo][cr]
SFX c   0           ovia       [^eo][cr]
SFX c   0           om         [^eo][cr]
SFX c   0           och        [^eo][cr]
SFX c   0           mi         [^eon][cr]
SFX c   0           ami        nc
SFX c   0           ovia       nc
SFX c   0           a          [^céior]
SFX c   0           ov         [^céior]
SFX c   0           ovi        [^céior]
SFX c   0           ovia       [^cčéior]
SFX c   0           om         [^céior]
SFX c   0           och        [^céior]
SFX c   0           mi         [^céior]
SFX c   0           ovia       [ey]n
SFX c   0           via        o
SFX c   or          rovia      [gk]or
SFX c   0           ovia       č[ei]k
SFX c   ok          kovia      ok
SFX c   0           ovia       duch
SFX c   0           ovia       ach
SFX c   0           ovia       ť
SFX c   0           ia         dič	# rodič
SFX c   0           i          dedič	# dedičia sú dvojtvar
SFX c   0           ia         žel
SFX c   ľ           lia        ľ
SFX c   n           nia        čan
SFX c   0           ia         brat
